Washington statutes.
RCW 43.382.020

Memoranda of agreement—Authority—Overlap with other agencies.

The ombuds shall collaborate and have a memoranda of agreement with the office of the state long-term care ombuds, the office of the family and children's ombuds, Washington protection and advocacy system, the mental health ombuds, and the office of the education ombuds to clarify authority in those situations where their mandates overlap.

[ 2016 c 172 s 7.]

NOTES:

Finding—2016 c 172: See note following RCW 43.382.005.